test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-12nwkwsj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nõkõsʼ: # Noun (12) nõkõsʼ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Nom: nõkõsʼ
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Gen: [nõgõsõ, nõgõssõ]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Par: nõgõst
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Ill: [nõgõssõhe, nõgõssõdõ]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Ine: [nõgõssõn, nõgõssõh, nõgõssõhn]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Ela: nõgõssõst
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+All: nõgõssõlõ
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Ade: nõgõssõl
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Abl: nõgõssõlt
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Tra: nõgõssõs
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Ter: nõgõssõniq
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Abe: nõgõssõldaq
     nõkõsʼ+N+Sg+Com: [nõgõsõgaq, nõgõssõgaq]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Nom: [nõgõsõq, nõgõssõq]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Gen: [nõgõssidõ, nõgõssiidõ, nõgõstõ]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Par: [nõgõssit, nõgõssiid]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Ill: [nõgõssihe, nõgõssiihe, nõgõssidõ, nõgõssiidõ, nõgõstõhe, nõgõstõdõ]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Ine: [nõgõssin, nõgõssiin, nõgõssih, nõgõssiih, nõgõssihn, nõgõssiihn, nõgõstõn, nõgõstõh, nõgõstõhn]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Ela: [nõgõssist, nõgõssiist, nõgõstõst]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+All: [nõgõssilõ, nõgõssiilõ, nõgõstõlõ]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Ade: [nõgõssil, nõgõssiil, nõgõstõl]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Abl: [nõgõssilt, nõgõssiilt, nõgõstõlt]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Tra: [nõgõssis, nõgõssiis, nõgõstõs]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Ter: [nõgõssiniq, nõgõssiiniq, nõgõstõniq]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Abe: [nõgõssildaq, nõgõssiildaq, nõgõstõldaq]
     nõkõsʼ+N+Pl+Com: [nõgõssidõgaq, nõgõssiidõgaq, nõgõstõgaq]
